Tennessee statutes. Title 33 Mental Health and Substance Abuse and Intellectual and Developmental Disabilities
Part 9

Violations of Service Recipient Rights

33-3-901. Wrongful hospitalization or admission — Instituting wrongful action — Penalties — Immunity.

A person commits a Class E felony who:

Without probable cause to believe a person has developmental disability, mental illness, or serious emotional disturbance, causes or conspires with or assists a third person to cause the hospitalization or admission of the person under this title; or

Causes or conspires with or assists another to cause the denial to a person of any right accorded to a person under this title.

A person commits a Class E felony who:

Without probable cause to believe a person has developmental disability, mental illness, or serious emotional disturbance executes a petition, application, or certificate under this title, or otherwise secures or attempts to secure the apprehension, detention, hospitalization, admission, or restraint of the person; or

Knowingly makes any false certificate or application under this title.

The commissioner or the chief officer of any hospital, developmental center, or treatment resource acting pursuant to this title shall be entitled to rely in good faith upon the representations made for admission by any person or any certification with respect to any person made by a professional authorized to provide certificates under this title or any court.

All persons acting in good faith, reasonably and without negligence in connection with the preparation of petitions, applications, certificates or other documents or the apprehension, detention, discharge, examination, transportation or treatment of a person under this title shall be free from all liability, civil or criminal, by reason of the acts.

Acts 1965, ch. 38, § 6; 1974, ch. 802, § 17; 1975, ch. 248, § 1; T.C.A., § 33-304; Acts 1984, ch. 922, § 2; 1986, ch. 570, § 2; 1989, ch. 591, § 29; T.C.A., § 33-3-102; Acts 2000, ch. 947, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. Former chapter 3, §§ 33-3-101 — 33-3-112, 33-3-201 — 33-3-203, 33-3-301 — 33-3-303, 33-3-401 — 33-3-412, 33-3-501 — 504, 33-3-601 — 33-3-603, 33-3-605 — 33-3-19, 33-3-623, 33-3-701 — 33-3-711, 33-3-801, 33-3-901 — 33-3-908 (Acts 1955, ch. 187, § 1; 1965, ch. 38, §§ 4-7, 16-19, 23-26; 1974, ch. 802, §§ 17-20, 22-25, 29-32; 1975, ch. 248, §§ 1, 5-7, 11; 1976, ch. 489, §§ 1, 2; 1976, ch. 763, §§ 1, 2, 10; 1977, ch. 482, § 11; 1978, ch. 533, §§ 3-5; 1978, ch. 533, § 7; 1978, ch. 877, §§ 1, 2; 1979, ch. 366, § 15; 1980, ch. 838, § 5; 1983, ch. 323, § 4-7, 9, 12, 15, 16; T.C.A. §§ 33-303 — 33-307, 33-309 — 33-312, 33-317 — 33-320, 33-330 — 33-337, 33-345 — 33-347, 33-355, 33-360 — 33-362, 33-364 — 33-378, 33-382, 33-610, 33-1101; Acts 1984, ch. 922, §§ 2-5, 7, 16-23, 34; 1984, ch. 986, §§ 1, 2; 1985, ch. 437, §§ 6-13, 33; 1986, ch. 570, §§ 2-4; 1986, ch. 836, § 3, 5; 1987, ch. 143, §§ 2, 3, 7; 1988, ch. 828, § 1; 1989, ch. 278, §§ 30-33; 1989, ch. 513, §§ 2, 5-13; 1989, ch. 591, §§ 29-31, 113; 1992, ch. 991, § 13; 1993, ch. 66, § 44; 1993, ch. 439, § 1; 1993, ch. 356, § 4; 1994, ch. 630, §§ 1, 2; 1994, ch. 743, § 1; 1995, ch. 320, § 1; 1995, ch. 411, § 1; 1996, ch. 669, § 1; 1996, ch. 675, § 15; 1996, ch. 1079, §§ 31-47, 49-56; 2000, ch. 947, § 6); § 33-3-304 (Acts 1974, ch. 464, § 1; 1975, ch. 248, § 20; T.C.A., § 33-702), which was previously repealed by Acts 1984, ch. 922, § 33; § 33-3-604 (Acts 1983, ch. 323, § 9; T.C.A., § 33-363), which was repealed by Acts 1984, ch. 922, § 33; § 33-3-620, which was previously transferred to § 33-6-104(e) and (f) in 1984; § 33-3-621, which was previously transferred to § 33-6-104(g) in 1984; and § 33-3-622, which was previously transferred to § 33-6-104(h) in 1984, is deleted and replaced in the revision of title 33 by Acts 2000, ch. 947, § 1, effective March 1, 2001.

Cross-References. Penalty for Class E felony, § 40-35-111.

Attorney General Opinions. Detention of mentally ill patients, OAG 07-092 (6/11/07), 2007 Tenn. AG LEXIS 92.

33-3-902. Furnishing false information — Misdemeanor.

It is a Class C misdemeanor for any person knowingly to furnish false information for the purpose of securing the hospitalization or admission of any person to a facility for persons with developmental disability, mental illness, or serious emotional disturbance.

Acts 1965, ch. 38, § 19; 1974, ch. 802, § 18; T.C.A., § 33-305; Acts 1989, ch. 591, § 113; T.C.A., § 33-3-103; Acts 2000, ch. 947, § 1.

Cross-References. Penalty for Class C misdemeanor, § 40-35-111.

33-3-903. Sexual relations with service recipient.

Any employee of a service provider who has sexual intercourse with a service recipient of the service provider other than the employee's spouse or commits sexual battery on a service recipient, knowing or having reason to believe that the service recipient is a service recipient of the service provider, is subject to discharge for that conduct.

Acts 1965, ch. 38, § 23; 1974, ch. 802, § 30; 1980, ch. 838, § 5; T.C.A., § 33-317; Acts 1989, ch. 591, §§ 30, 31, 113; T.C.A., § 33-3-106(e); Acts 2000, ch. 947, § 1.

33-3-904. Aiding or abetting escape — Inciting service recipient to violence — Supplying with dangerous or intoxicating substances.

A person commits a Class E felony who:

Counsels, causes, influences, aids or assists a service recipient with mental illness, serious emotional disturbance, or developmental disability to leave a hospital or developmental center without authority after the service recipient was admitted under court order;

Harbors or conceals a service recipient with mental illness, serious emotional disturbance, or developmental disability who has left a hospital or developmental center without authority;

Incites a service recipient with mental illness, serious emotional disturbance, or developmental disability, while the service recipient is admitted to a hospital or developmental center, to hurt or injure another person anywhere; or

Gives or sells to a service recipient with mental illness, serious emotional disturbance, or developmental disability in a hospital or developmental center, whether on the premises of the facility or elsewhere, knowing the person to be a person with mental illness, serious emotional disturbance, or developmental disability, any firearms, intoxicating drinks, drugs, or any other harmful articles.

A hospital or developmental center employee or official who receives from a person with mental illness, serious emotional disturbance, or developmental disability anything of value as a gift or for a consideration commits a Class C misdemeanor.

A person, who aids or abets in the commission of any of the foregoing offenses or aids or abets in a prohibited attempt, is guilty as if the person were a principal and shall be punished as a principal.

Acts 1965, ch. 38, § 23; 1974, ch. 802, § 30; 1980, ch. 838, § 5; T.C.A., § 33-317; Acts 1989, ch. 591, §§ 30, 31, 113; T.C.A., § 33-3-106(b)-(d); Acts 2000, ch. 947, § 1.

Code Commission Notes.

This section is similar to former § 33-3-106(b)-(d).

Cross-References. Penalty for Class C misdemeanor, § 40-35-111.

Penalty for Class E felony, § 40-35-111.

33-3-120. Isolation and restraints prohibited — Exceptions and limitations.

33-3-125. Professional not to be related or to have financial interest.

33-3-212. Immunity for refusal to perform act prohibited by this title.

33-3-217. Uniform assessment process for determining recipient's decision making capacity.

33-3-605. Service on defendant.